Georgia, session 2025_26, HB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended by revising Code Section 48-7-29.10, relating to tax credits for qualified child
and dependent care tax credits, as follows:
"48-7-29.10.
(a) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Code Section 48-7-20
for qualified child and dependent care expenses. Such credit shall be determined by
applying a percentage to the amount of the credit provided for in Section 21 of the Internal
Revenue Code which is claimed and allowed pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code. Such
percentage shall be:
H. B. 99
- 1 -

LC 59 0048
(1) Ten percent for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2006, and prior to
January 1, 2007;
(2) Twenty percent for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, and prior
to January 1, 2008; and
(3) Thirty percent for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and prior
to January 1, 2025; and
(4) One-hundred percent for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
(b) In no event shall the total amount of the tax credit under this Code section for a taxable
year exceed the taxpayer's income tax liability. Any unused tax credit shall not be allowed
to be carried forward to apply to the taxpayer's succeeding years' tax liability. No such tax
credit shall be allowed the taxpayer against prior years' tax liability.
(b.1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, for taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, if the total amount of the tax credit provided
for in this Code section exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability for a taxable year, such
excess funds shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(c) The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to implement and administer this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 99
- 2 -